Mississippi, session 2026, HB684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created the Mississippi Menhaden Processing Plant Odor Elimination Task Force to review and make recommendations on how to eliminate the odor and toxic air pollution produced by the menhaden processing plants on the Mississippi Gulf Coast. (2)  The task force shall be composed of the following members: (a)  The Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources, or his or her designee; (b)  The Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, or his or her designee; (c)  Two (2) members of the Mississippi House of Representatives who represent districts on the Mississippi Gulf Coast, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (d)  Two (2) members of the Mississippi Senate who represent districts on the Mississippi Gulf Coast, to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (3)  The duties of the task force shall include the following: (a)  Identify how much of the air quality on the Mississippi Gulf Coast is affected by the odors and toxic pollution produced by the menhaden processing plant; (b)  Determine what measures, if any, have been put into place by the menhaden processing plant to reduce the odor being emitted; (c)  Determine what changes need to be made at the menhaden processing plant to reduce the odor being emitted; and (d)  Determine what state law changes need to be made to prevent the menhaden processing plant from producing odors and toxic pollution. (4)  (a)  Appointments to the task force shall be made within thirty (30) days after the effective date of this act.  Within fifteen (15) days thereafter on a day to be designated jointly by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Lieutenant Governor, the task force shall meet and organize by selecting from its membership a chair and a vice chair.  The vice chair shall also serve as secretary and shall be responsible for keeping all records of the task force. Four (4) of the members of the task force shall constitute a quorum.  In the selection of its officers and the adoption of rules, resolutions and reports, an affirmative vote of a majority of the task force shall be required.  All members shall be notified in writing of all meetings, and those notices shall be mailed at least fifteen (15) days before the date on which a meeting is to be held. (b)  The task force shall meet at least once each month and provide monthly reports to the Legislature on its activities. (c)  The task force shall make a final report of its findings and recommendations, including any recommended legislation, to the Legislature not later than December 1, 2026, at which time the task force will be dissolved. (5)  Members of the task force shall receive no compensation for their service on the task force, but may receive reimbursement for mileage and actual expenses as provided in Section 25-3-41, to the extent that funds are available for that purpose. (6)  The Mississippi Department of Marine Resources shall provide the staff and other support necessary for the task force to perform its duties. (7)  To effectuate the purposes of this act, any department, division, board, bureau, committee, institution or agency of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, shall, at the request of the chairman of the task force, provide the facilities, assistance, information and data needed to enable the task force to carry out its duties. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.